Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-204
Lien
satisfied; financing statement; termination.

When a lien created under
section 52-202 is satisfied, any
financing statement filed to perfect that lien shall be terminated in the
manner and form provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1988, LB 943, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB750, § 3.